North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 8. Hearsay.
“No branch of the law should be less firmly bound to a past century than the rules of evidence. The purpose of the rules of evidence is to assist the jury to arrive at the truth. Exceptions to the hearsay rule, evolved by the experience and wisdom of our predecessors for that purpose, should not be transformed by us into rigid molds precluding all testimony not capable of being squeezed neatly into one of them.”

North Carolina courts have admitted hearsay evidence in many instances on the ground that the evidence was part of the “
res gestae
”. The

res gestae

formula has been frequently resorted to in cases that would seem to be more appropriately governed by independent hearsay rules. See

Brandis on North Carolina Evidence

§ 158 (1982). The phrase

res gestae

“has been accountable for so much confusion that it had best be denied any place whatever in legal terminology.”

U.S.

v.

Matot,

146 F.2d 197 (2d. Cir. 1944) (Learned Hand). Although evidence previously governed by the

res gestae

formula may now fall within the specific hearsay exceptions or the catch-all in Exception 24, the

res gestae

formula should not be relied on by the courts.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-247, s. 11(a), effective October 1, 2015, in the first sentence of subdivision (6), added the (i) and (ii) designators and made related stylistic changes, and inserted “or by affidavit or by document under seal under Rule 902 of the Rules of Evidence made by the custodian or witness”; and added the next-to-last sentence.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on the future of character impeachment in North Carolina, in light of State v. Jean,

310 N.C. 157

, 311 S.E.2d 266 (1984), see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 535 (1985).

For note, “State v. Smith: Facilitating the Admissibility of Hearsay Statements in Child Sexual Abuse Cases,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1352 (1986).

For note, “State v. Stafford: Rape Trauma Syndrome and the Admissibility of Statements Made by Rape Victims,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1364 (1986).

For article, “Guilt by Intuition: The Insufficiency of Prior Inconsistent Statements To Convict,” see 65 N.C.L. Rev. 1 (1986).

For article, “Not So ‘Firmly Rooted’: Exceptions to the Confrontation Clause,” see 66 N.C.L. Rev. 1 (1987).

For note, “Admission of the Unthinkable: Hearsay Exceptions and Statements Made by Sexually Abused Children—State v. Smith,” see 9 Campbell L. Rev. 437 (1987).

For article, “Child Sexual Abuse and Statements for the Purpose of Medical Diagnosis or Treatment,” see 67 N.C.L. Rev. 257 (1989).

For note, “Criminal Procedure — Presumed Guilty: The Use of Videotaped and Closed-Circuit Televised Testimony in Child Sex Abuse Prosecutions and the Defendant’s Right to Confrontation — Coy v. Iowa,” see 11 Campbell L. Rev. 381 (1989).

For note, “Constitutional Admissibility of Hearsay Under the Confrontation Clause: Reliability Requirement for Hearsay Admitted Under a Non-‘Firmly Rooted’ Exception,” see 14 Campbell L. Rev. 347 (1993).

For Survey of Developments in North Carolina Law (1992), see 71 N.C.L. Rev. 1893 (1993).

For article, “Confrontation and Hearsay: New Wine in An Old Bottle,” 16 Campbell L. Rev. 1 (1994).

For article, “Issues Once Moot: The Other Evidentiary Objections to the Admission of Exculpatory Polygraph Examinations,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1045 (1997).

For note, “State v. Alston: North Carolina Continues to Broaden its Mind to Admissibility of a Victim’s Out-of-Court Statements Under the Rule 803(3) Hearsay Exception in Criminal Cases,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1327 (1997).

For article, “Recent Developments: State v. Hinnant: Limiting the Medical Treatment Hearsay Exception in Child Sexual Abuse Cases,” see 79 N.C.L. Rev. 1089 (2001).

For note, “Not-So-Secrets? The State of the Attorney-Client Privilege in North Carolina in the Wake of In re Investigation of Death of Eric Miller and Crawford v. Washington,” see 83 N.C. L. Rev. 1591 (2005).

For recent development, “The Defense Calls ... the Accuser? State v. Brigman and How the North Carolina Court of Appeals Misconstrued Crawford’s Application to Available Witnesses,” see 84 N.C. L. Rev. 2082 (2006).